Illinois, session 104th, SB451.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act may be cited as the the Election Code. 8This Act is the general election law of Illinois and any 9reference in any other Act to "the general election law" or 10"the general election law of this State" is a reference to this 11Act, as now or hereafter amended.12(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)